California statutes. Penal Code
(a) For the purpose of raising the level of competence of local corrections and probation officers and other correctional personnel, the board shall adopt, and may from time to time amend, rules establishing minimum standards for the selection and training of these personnel employed by any city, county, or city and county who provide for the custody, supervision, treatment, or rehabilitation of persons accused of, or adjudged responsible for, criminal or delinquent conduct who are currently under local jurisdiction. All of these rules
 shall be adopted and amended pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) Any city, county, or city and county may adhere to the standards for selection and training established by the board. The board may defer the promulgation of selection standards until necessary research for job relatedness is completed.

(c) Minimum training standards may include, but are not limited to, basic, entry, continuation, supervisory, management, and specialized assignments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 158, Sec. 3.   Effective August 2, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6036.

For purposes of implementing this article, the board shall have the following powers:

(a) Approve or certify, or both, training and education courses at institutions approved by the board.

(b) Develop and operate a professional certificate program which provides recognition of achievement for local corrections and probation officers whose agencies participate in the program.

(c) Adopt those regulations as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(d) Develop and present training courses for local corrections and probation officers.

(e) Perform those other activities and studies as would carry out the intent of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 158, Sec. 4.   Effective August 2, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Corrections Training Fund [6040. - 6040.]

6040.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury a Corrections Training Fund. Upon appropriation from the fund, moneys shall be used exclusively for the costs of administration, the development of appropriate standards, the development of training, and program evaluation, pursuant to this chapter. The fund is abolished on June 30, 2021, and any moneys remaining in the fund shall revert to the State Penalty Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 36, Sec. 24.   (AB 1812)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Mentally Ill Offender Crime Reduction Grants [6045. - 6045.9.]

6045.

(a) The Board of State and Community Corrections shall administer mentally ill offender crime reduction grants on a competitive basis to counties that expand or establish a continuum of timely and effective responses to reduce crime and criminal justice costs related to mentally ill offenders. The grants administered under this article by the board shall be divided equally between adult and juvenile
 mentally ill offender crime reduction grants in accordance with the funds appropriated for each type of grant. The grants shall support prevention, intervention, supervision, and incarceration-based services and strategies to reduce recidivism and to improve outcomes for mentally ill juvenile and adult offenders.

(b) For purposes of this article, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) “Board” means the Board of State and Community Corrections.

(2) “Mentally ill adult offenders” means persons described in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 5600.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(3) “Mentally ill juvenile offenders” means persons described in subdivision (a) of Section 5600.3 of the Welfare and Institutions
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 436, Sec. 2.   (SB 1054)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6045.2.

(a) A county shall be eligible to apply for either an adult mentally ill offender grant or a juvenile mentally ill offender grant or both in accordance with all other provisions of this article. The board shall provide a separate and competitive grant application and award process for each of the adult and juvenile mentally ill offender crime reduction grant categories. The board shall endeavor to assist counties that apply for grants in both categories in
 meeting any grant submission requirements that may overlap between the two categories of grants.

(b) (1) A county that applies for an adult mentally ill offender grant shall establish a strategy committee to design the grant application that includes, at a minimum, the sheriff or director of the county department of corrections in a county where the sheriff does not administer the county jail system, who shall chair the committee, and representatives from other local law enforcement agencies, the chief probation officer, the county mental health director, a superior court judge, a former offender who is or has been a client of a mental health treatment facility, and representatives from organizations that can provide or have provided treatment or stabilization services for mentally ill offenders, including treatment, housing, income or job support, and caretaking.

(2) A county that applies for a juvenile mentally ill offender grant shall establish a strategy committee that includes, at a minimum, the chief probation officer who shall chair the committee, representatives from local law enforcement agencies, the county mental health director, a superior court judge, a client or former offender who has received juvenile mental health services, and representatives from organizations that can provide or have provided treatment or support services for mentally ill juvenile offenders, including therapy, education, employment, housing, and caretaking services.

(3) A county that applies for both types of grants may convene a combined strategy committee that includes the sheriff or jail administrator and the chief probation officer as cochairs of the committee, as well as representation from the other agencies, departments, and disciplines designated in paragraphs (1) and (2) for both types of
 committees.

(c) The strategy committee shall develop and describe in its grant application a comprehensive county plan for providing a cost-effective continuum of responses and services for mentally ill adult offenders or mentally ill juvenile offenders, including prevention, intervention, and incarceration-based services, as appropriate. The plan shall describe how the responses and services included in the plan have been proven to be or are designed to be effective in addressing the mental health needs of the target offender population, while also reducing recidivism and custody levels for mentally ill offenders in adult or juvenile detention or correctional facilities. Strategies for prevention, intervention, and incarceration-based services in the plan shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Mental health and substance abuse treatment for mentally ill
 adult offenders or mentally ill juvenile offenders who are presently placed, incarcerated, or housed in a local adult or juvenile detention or correctional facility or who are under supervision by the probation department after having been released from a state or local adult or juvenile detention or correctional facility.

(2) Prerelease, reentry, continuing, and community-based services designed to provide long-term stability for juvenile or adult offenders outside of the facilities of the adult or juvenile justice systems, including services to support a stable source of income, a safe and decent residence, and a conservator or caretaker, as needed in appropriate cases.

(3) For mentally ill juvenile offender applications, one or more of the following strategies that has proven to be effective or has evidence-based support for effectiveness in the remediation of mental health
 disorders and the reduction of offending: short-term and family-based therapies, collaborative interagency service agreements, specialized court-based assessment and disposition tracks or programs, or other specialized mental health treatment and intervention models for juvenile offenders that are proven or promising from an evidence-based perspective.

(d) The plan as included in the grant application shall include the identification of specific outcome and performance measures and for annual reporting on grant performance and outcomes to the board that will allow the board to evaluate, at a minimum, the effectiveness of the strategies supported by the grant in reducing crime, incarceration, and criminal justice costs related to mentally ill offenders. The board shall, in the grant application process, provide guidance to counties on the performance measures and reporting criteria to be addressed in the application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 26, Sec. 32.   (AB 1468)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6045.4.

(a) The application submitted by a county shall describe a four-year plan for the programs, services, or strategies to be provided under the grant. The board shall award grants that provide funding for three years. Funding shall be used to supplement, rather than supplant, funding for existing programs. Funds may be used to fund specialized alternative custody and diversion programs that offer
 appropriate mental health treatment and services.

(b) A grant shall not be awarded unless the applicant makes available resources in accordance with the instructions of the board in an amount equal to at least 25 percent of the amount of the grant. Resources may include in-kind contributions from participating agencies.

(c) In awarding grants, priority or preference shall be given to those grant applications that include documented match funding that exceeds 25 percent of the total grant amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 473, Sec. 1.   (SB 621)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6045.6.

The board shall establish minimum requirements, funding criteria, and procedures for awarding grants, which shall take into consideration, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) The probable or potential impact of the grant on reducing the number or percent of mentally ill adult offenders or mentally ill juvenile offenders who are incarcerated or detained in local adult or juvenile correctional facilities and,
 as relevant for juvenile offenders, in probation out-of-home placements.

(b) Demonstrated ability to administer the program, including any past experience in the administration of a prior mentally ill offender crime reduction grant.

(c) Demonstrated ability to develop effective responses and to provide effective treatment and stability for mentally ill adult offenders or mentally ill juvenile offenders.

(d) Demonstrated ability to provide for interagency collaboration to ensure the effective coordination and delivery of the strategies, programs, or services described in the application.

(e) Likelihood that the program will continue to operate after state grant funding ends, including the applicant’s demonstrated history of maximizing federal, state,
 local, and private funding sources to address the needs of the grant service population.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 26, Sec. 32.   (AB 1468)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6045.9.

The board may use up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated for purposes of this article to administer this program, including technical assistance to counties and the development of the evaluation component.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 26, Sec. 32.   (AB 1468)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Second Chance Program [6046. - 6046.3.]

6046.

(a) The purpose of this article is to build safer communities by investing in community-based programs, services, and initiatives for formerly incarcerated individuals in need of mental health and substance use treatment services.

(b) The program established pursuant to this article shall be restricted to supporting mental health treatment, substance use treatment, and diversion programs for persons in
 the criminal justice system, with an emphasis on programs that reduce recidivism of persons convicted of less serious crimes, such as those covered by the Safe Neighborhoods and Schools Act of 2014, and those who have substance use and mental health problems.

(c) The Board of State and Community Corrections shall administer a grant program established pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 438, Sec. 4.   (AB 1056)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6046.1.

For the purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Board” means the Board of State and Community Corrections.

(b) “Fund” means the Second Chance Fund established pursuant to Section 6046.2.

(c) “Public agency” means a county, city, whether a general law city or a
 chartered city, or city and county, the duly constituted governing body of an Indian reservation or rancheria, a school district, municipal corporation, district, political subdivision, or any board, commission, or agency thereof, entities that are legislative bodies of a local agency pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 54952 of the Government Code, a housing authority organized pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 34200) of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code, a state agency, public district, or other political subdivision of the state, or any instrumentality thereof, which is authorized to engage in or assist in the development or operation of housing for persons and families of low or moderate income.

(d) “Recidivism” means a conviction of a new felony or misdemeanor committed within three years of release from custody or committed within three years of placement on supervision for a previous criminal
 conviction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 438, Sec. 4.   (AB 1056)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6046.2.

(a) The Second Chance Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. The board shall be responsible for administering the fund. Moneys in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal year for the purposes of this article.

(b) (1) The Controller, upon order of the Director of Finance, shall transfer moneys available to the Board of State and Community
 Corrections pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 7599.2 of the Government Code into the Second Chance Fund.

(2) The Second Chance Fund may receive moneys from any other federal, state, or local grant, or from any private donation or grant, for the purposes of this article.

(c) The board shall not spend more than 5 percent annually of the moneys in the fund for administrative costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 438, Sec. 4.   (AB 1056)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6046.3.

(a) The board shall administer a competitive grant program to carry out the purposes of this article that focuses on community-based solutions for reducing recidivism. The grant program shall, at minimum, do all of the following:

(1) Restrict eligibility to proposals designed to serve people who have been arrested, charged with, or convicted of a criminal offense and have a history of mental health
 or substance use disorders.

(2) Restrict eligibility to proposals that offer mental health services, substance use disorder treatment services, misdemeanor diversion programs, or some combination thereof.

(3) Restrict eligibility to proposals that have a public agency as the lead applicant.

(b) The board shall form an executive steering committee that includes, but is not limited to, a balanced and diverse membership from relevant state and local government entities, community-based treatment and service providers, and the formerly incarcerated community. The committee shall have expertise in homelessness and housing, behavioral health and substance abuse treatment, and effective rehabilitative treatment for adults and juveniles. The committee shall make recommendations regarding the design, efficacy, and viability
 of proposals, and make recommendations on guidelines for the submission of proposals, including threshold or scoring criteria, or both, that do all of the following:

(1) Prioritize proposals that advance principles of restorative justice while demonstrating a capacity to reduce recidivism.

(2) Prioritize proposals that leverage other federal, state, and local funds or other social investments, such as the following sources of funding:

(A) The Drug Medi-Cal Treatment Program (22 Cal. Code Regs. 51341.1, 51490.1, and 51516.1).

(B) The Mental Health Services Act, enacted by Proposition 63 at the November 2, 2004, general election, as amended.

(C) Funds provided for in connection with the
 implementation of Chapter 15 of the Statutes of 2011.

(D) The Community Corrections Performance Incentives Act (Stats. 2009, Ch. 608; Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1228) of Title 8 of Part 2).

(E) The tax credits established pursuant to Sections 12209, 17053.57, and 23657 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(F) The federal Department of Housing and Urban Development funds, such as the Emergency Solutions Grant program (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11371 et seq.).

(G) The federal Department of Veterans Affairs Supportive Services for Veteran Families program (38 U.S.C. Sec. 2044).

(H) Social Innovation Funds established by the Corporation for National and Community Service pursuant to Section 12653k
 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(I) The Edward Byrne Memorial Justice Assistance Grant Program (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3750 et seq.).

(3) Prioritize proposals that provide for all of the following:

(A) Mental health services, substance use disorder treatment services, misdemeanor diversion programs, or some combination thereof.

(B) Housing-related assistance that utilizes evidence-based models, including, but not limited to, those recommended by the federal Department of Housing and Urban Development. Housing-related assistance may include, but is not limited to, the following:

(i) Financial assistance, including security deposits, utility payments, moving-cost assistance, and up to 24
 months of rental assistance.

(ii) Housing stabilization assistance, including case management, relocation assistance, outreach and engagement, landlord recruitment, housing navigation and placement, and credit repair.

(C) Other community-based supportive services, such as job skills training, case management, and civil legal services.

(4) Prioritize proposals that leverage existing contracts, partnerships, memoranda of understanding, or other formal relationships to provide one or more of the services prioritized in paragraph (3).

(5) Prioritize proposals put forth by a public agency in partnership with a philanthropic or nonprofit organization.

(6) Prioritize proposals that promote
 interagency and regional collaborations.

(7) Consider ways to promote services for people with offenses identical or similar to those addressed by the Safe Neighborhoods and Schools Act of 2014, without precluding assistance to a person with other offenses in his or her criminal history.

(8) Consider geographic diversity.

(9) Consider appropriate limits for administrative costs and overhead.

(10) Consider proposals that provide services to juveniles.

(11) Permit proposals to expand the capacity of an existing program and prohibit proposals from using the fund to supplant funding for an existing program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 438, Sec. 4.   (AB 1056)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Standards for Mental Health Care in Local Correctional Facilities [6048. - 6048.5.]

6048.

Commencing July 1, 2024, the board shall develop and adopt regulations setting minimum standards for mental health care at local correctional facilities that meet or exceed the standards for health services in jails established by the National Commission on Correctional Health Care, as follows:

(a) Safety checks of incarcerated persons shall be sufficiently detailed to determine the safety and well-being of the incarcerated person, and that they are not in distress. This determination shall not require facility staff to disturb or wake incarcerated persons during sleeping hours.

(b) Correctional officers shall be certified in
 cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) and shall be required, when safe and
 appropriate to do so, to begin CPR on a nonresponsive person without obtaining approval from supervisors or medical staff.

(c) Jail supervisors shall be required to conduct random audits of safety checks which shall include a review of logs and video footage, if available, to ensure that safety checks are properly performed.

(d) In-service training of correctional officers shall include no fewer than four hours of training on mental and behavioral health annually. Training requirements prescribed in this subdivision shall be developed by Board of State and Community Corrections standards of training for corrections.

(e) Mental health screening or evaluation conducted at booking or intake shall be
 conducted by a qualified mental health care professional, if available. Mental health screening or evaluation that is conducted by anybody other than a qualified mental health care professional shall be reviewed by a qualified mental health care professional as soon as reasonably practicable.

(f) Jail staff shall review the medical and mental health history and the county electronic health record, if available, of any person booked or transferred into the jail to determine any history of mental health issues.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 298, Sec. 3.   (AB 268)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6048.5.

As used in this article, “qualified mental health care professional” means a physician, physician assistant, nurse, nurse practitioner, psychologist licensed by the Board of Psychology, registered psychologist, postdoctoral psychological assistant, postdoctoral psychology trainee employed in an exempt setting pursuant to Section 2910 of the Business and Professions Code or employed pursuant to a State Department of Health Care Services waiver pursuant to Section 5751.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, marriage and family therapist, associate marriage and family therapist, licensed clinical social worker, associate clinical social worker, licensed professional clinical counselor, associate professional clinical counselor, or other person who, by
 virtue of their credentials, is permitted by law to evaluate and care for
 patients, and who, by virtue of their credentialing, or in addition to their credentialing, has received instruction, training, or expertise in identifying and interacting with persons in need of mental health services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 298, Sec. 3.   (AB 268)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Appointment of Personnel [6050. - 6055.]

6050.

(a) The Governor, upon recommendation of the secretary, shall appoint the wardens of the various state prisons. Each warden shall be subject to removal by the secretary. If the secretary removes him or her, the secretary’s action shall be final. The wardens shall be exempt from civil service.

(b) The Department of Human Resources shall fix the compensation of the wardens of the state
 prisons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 665, Sec. 183.   (SB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6053.

(a) All persons other than temporary appointees heretofore serving in the state civil service and engaged in the performance of a function transferred to the department or engaged in the administration of a law, the administration of which is transferred to the department, shall remain in the state civil service and are hereby transferred to the department on the effective date of this section, and their status, positions and rights shall not be affected by their transfer and shall continue to be retained by them pursuant to the State Civil Service Act. The director, pursuant to the State
 Civil Service Act, shall be the appointing authority for the department for all civil service positions except those civil service positions in the Youth Authority. Positions not heretofore established, which are exclusively for the California Institution for Women or exclusively for the Youth Authority, shall be filled pursuant to the State Civil Service Act.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 18932 of the Government Code, the maximum age shall be 35 years for any open examination for the position of correctional officer, correctional program supervisor, and other custodial positions which normally afford entry into the Department of Corrections service, unless the applicant is already a “state safety” member for the purpose of retirement and disability benefits or was employed in a permanent, temporary, part-time, or intermittent capacity with the department after July 1, 1973, but before January 1, 1974.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 165.   Superseded on operative date of amendment by Stats. 1981, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

6053.

(a) All persons other than temporary appointees heretofore serving in the state civil service and engaged in the performance of a function transferred to the department or engaged in the administration of a law the administration of which is transferred to the department shall remain in the state civil service and are hereby transferred to
 the department on the effective date of this section; and their status, positions and rights shall not be affected by their transfer and shall continue to be retained by them pursuant to the State Civil Service Act. The director, pursuant to the State Civil Service Act, shall be the appointing authority for the department for all civil service positions except those civil service positions in the Youth Authority. Positions not heretofore established which are exclusively for the California Institution for Women or exclusively for the Youth Authority shall be filled pursuant to the State Civil Service Act.

(b) Any open examination for the position of correctional officer, correctional program supervisor, and other custodial positions which normally afford entry into the Department of Corrections service shall require a demonstration of the physical ability to effectively carry out the duties and responsibilities of the position in a manner which
 would not inordinately endanger the health or safety of a custodial person or the health and safety of others.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 453, Sec. 5.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by Sec. 8 of Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

6055.

The Department of Corrections and the Department of the Youth Authority may provide time off with pay to security and treatment personnel who take courses approved by the departments on mental health treatment related to their jobs. The departments may also provide financial compensation to pay for the cost of such courses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1258.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.5. Internal Investigations [6065. - 6065.]

6065.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that investigations of the Department of Corrections and the Department of the Youth Authority that are conducted by their respective offices of internal affairs, or any successor to these offices, require appropriately trained personnel, who perform their duties with honesty, credibility, and without any conflicts of interest.

(b) To meet the objectives stated in subdivision (a), the following conditions shall be met:

(1) Prior to training any peace officer who is selected to conduct internal affairs investigations, the department shall conduct a complete and thorough background check. This background check shall be in addition to the original background screening that was conducted when the person was hired as a peace officer. Each person shall satisfactorily pass the second background check. Any person who has been the subject of a sustained, serious disciplinary action, including, but not limited to, termination, suspension, or demotion, shall not pass the background check.

(2) All internal affairs allegations or complaints, whether investigated or not, shall be logged and numbered sequentially on an annual basis. The log shall specify, but not be limited to, the following information: the sequential number of the allegation or complaint, the date of receipt of the allegation or complaint, the
 location or facility to which the allegation or complaint pertains, and the disposition of all actions taken, including any final action taken. The log shall be made available to the Inspector General.

(c) Consistent with the objectives expressed in subdivision (a), investigators shall conduct investigations and inquiries in a manner that provides a complete and thorough presentation of the facts regarding the allegation or complaint. All extenuating and mitigating facts shall be explored and reported. The role of the investigator is that of a factfinder. All reports prepared by an investigator shall provide the appointing authority with a complete recitation of the facts, and shall refrain from conjecture or opinion.

(1) Uncorroborated or anonymous allegations shall not constitute the sole basis for disciplinary action by the department, other than an investigation.

(2) All reports shall be submitted in a standard format, begin with a statement of the allegation or complaint, provide all relevant facts, and include the investigator’s signature, certifying that the investigator has complied with the provisions of this section subject to compliance with Sections 118.1 and 148.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 83, Sec. 159.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Definitions [6080. - 6082.]

6080.

As used in his part, the following terms have the meanings described below:

(a) “Department” refers to the Department of Corrections.

(b) “Director” refers to the Director of Corrections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1944, 3rd [1st] Ex. Sess., Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6081.

As used in this code, “prison” and “state prison” include the California Institution for Women.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 165.)
-------------------------------------------

6082.

References in this title and in Title 5 (commencing with Section 4500) to prisons refer to all facilities, camps, hospitals and institutions for the confinement, treatment, employment, training and discipline of persons in the legal custody of the Department of Corrections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 163.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. The Medical Facility [6100. - 6106.]

6100.

There is hereby established an institution under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections to be known as the Medical Facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1491.)
-------------------------------------------

6101.

The Medical Facility shall be located in the northern part of the State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1946, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

6102.

The primary purpose of the medical facility shall be the receiving, segregation, confinement, treatment, and care of males under the custody of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or any agency thereof who are any of the following:

(a) Persons with mental health disorders.

(b) Persons with developmental disabilities.

(c) Persons who are addicted to the use of controlled substances.

(d) Persons who are suffering from any other chronic disease or condition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 231.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

6103.

The Director of Corrections shall construct and equip, in accordance with law, suitable buildings, structures, and facilities for the Medical Facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1491.)
-------------------------------------------

6104.

The Director of Corrections shall make rules and regulations for the government of the Medical Facility and the management of its affairs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1491.)
-------------------------------------------

6105.

The Governor, upon the recommendation of the Director of Corrections, in accordance with Section 6050, shall appoint a warden for the medical facility. The director shall appoint, subject to civil service, those other officers and employees as may be necessary.

The Director of Corrections may remove a warden at his or her own discretion at any time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1279, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6106.

The supervision, management, and control of the Medical Facility and the responsibility for the care, custody, treatment, training, discipline and employment of persons confined therein are vested in the Director of Corrections. The provisions of Part 3 (commencing with Section 2000) apply to the institution as a prison under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and to the persons confined therein insofar as those provisions may be applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 164.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8.2. Office of the Inspector General [6125. - 6133.]

6125.

There is hereby created the independent Office of the Inspector General which shall not be a subdivision of any other governmental entity. The Governor shall appoint, subject to confirmation by the Senate, the Inspector General to a six-year term. The Inspector General may not be removed from office during that term, except for good cause.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 35, Sec. 13.   (SB 174)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

6126.

(a) The Inspector General shall be responsible for contemporaneous oversight of internal affairs investigations and the disciplinary process of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, pursuant to Section 6133 under policies to be developed by the Inspector General.

(b) When requested by the Governor, the Senate Committee on Rules, or the Speaker of the Assembly, the Inspector General shall initiate an audit or review of policies, practices, and procedures of the department. The Inspector General may, under policies developed by the Inspector General, initiate an audit or review on the Inspector General’s own accord. Following a completed audit or review, the Inspector General may perform a
 follow-up audit or review to determine what measures the department implemented to address the Inspector General’s findings and to assess the effectiveness of those measures.

(c) (1) Upon completion of an audit or review pursuant to subdivision (b), the Inspector General shall prepare a complete written report, which may be held as confidential and disclosed in confidence, along with all underlying materials the Inspector General deems appropriate, to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and to the requesting entity in subdivision (b), where applicable.

(2) The Inspector General shall also prepare a public report. When necessary, the public report shall differ from the complete written report in the respect that the Inspector General shall have the discretion to redact or otherwise protect the names of
 individuals, specific locations, or other facts that, if not redacted, might hinder prosecution related to the review, compromise the safety and security of staff, inmates, or members of the public, or where disclosure of the information is otherwise prohibited by law, and to decline to produce any of the underlying materials. Copies of public reports shall be posted on the Office of the Inspector General’s internet website.

(d) The Inspector General shall, during the course of an audit or review, identify areas of full and partial compliance, or noncompliance, with departmental policies and procedures, specify deficiencies in the completion and documentation of processes, and recommend corrective actions, including, but not limited to, additional training, additional policies, or changes in policy, as well as any other findings or recommendations that the Inspector General deems appropriate.

(e) The Inspector General, pursuant to Section 6126.6, shall review the Governor’s candidates for appointment to serve as warden for the state’s adult correctional institutions and as superintendents for the state’s juvenile facilities.

(f) The Inspector General shall conduct an objective, clinically appropriate, and metric-oriented medical inspection program to periodically review delivery of medical care at each state prison.

(g) The Inspector General shall, in consultation with the Department of Finance, develop a methodology for producing a workload budget to be used for annually adjusting the budget of the Office of the Inspector General, beginning with the budget for the 2005–06 fiscal year.

(h) The Inspector General shall provide contemporaneous oversight of grievances that fall within the department’s process for reviewing and investigating inmate allegations of staff misconduct and other specialty grievances, examining
 compliance with regulations, department policy, and best practices. This contemporaneous oversight shall be completed within the Inspector General’s budget excluding resources that, beginning in the Budget Act of 2019, were provided to restore the Inspector General’s ability to initiate an audit or review pursuant to subdivision (a). The contemporaneous oversight shall be completed in a way that does not unnecessarily slow the department’s review and investigation of inmate allegations of staff misconduct and other specialty grievances. The Inspector General shall issue reports annually, beginning in 2021.

(i) The Inspector General shall monitor the department’s process
 for reviewing uses of force and shall issue reports annually.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 10, Sec. 17.   (AB 134)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6126.2.

The Inspector General shall not hire any person known to be considered a suspect or subject in an investigation being conducted by any federal, state, or local agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 364, Sec. 13.   (SB 112)   Effective September 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6126.3.

(a) The Inspector General shall not destroy any papers or memoranda used to support a completed review within three years after a report is released.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), all books, papers, records, and correspondence of the office pertaining to its work are public records subject to Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code and shall be filed at any of the regularly maintained offices of the Inspector General.

(c) The following books, papers, records, and correspondence of the Office of the Inspector General pertaining to its work are not public records subject to Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the